Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Aid for Special Education and Support Services

§ 2961. Section 2961 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2961 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Standard mainstream block grants.

Each supervisory union shall be eligible to receive a standard mainstream block grant each school year. The mainstream block grant shall be equal to the supervisory union’s mainstream salary standard multiplied by 60 percent.

The supervisory union shall expend all such assistance for special education services or for remedial or compensatory services in accordance with its service plan as required under section 2964 of this title. It shall likewise expend, from local funds, an amount not less than 40 percent of its mainstream salary standard for special education.

As used in this section:

“Mainstream salary standard” means:

the supervisory union’s full-time equivalent staffing for special education for the preceding year multiplied by the average special education teacher salary in the State for the preceding year; plus

an amount equal to the average special education administrator salary in the State for the preceding year, plus, for any supervisory union with member districts that have in the aggregate more than 1,500 average daily membership, a fraction of an additional full-time equivalent salary for a special education administrator, the numerator of which is the aggregate average daily membership of the supervisory union’s member districts minus 1,500, and the denominator of which is the aggregate average daily membership of member districts in the largest supervisory union in the State minus 1,500.

“Full-time equivalent staffing” means 9.75 special education teaching positions per 1,000 average daily membership.

If in any fiscal year, a supervisory union in which a school is maintained does not expend an amount equal to its mainstream salary standard on special education expenditures, the supervisory union may expend the balance, including the matching funds, to provide support and remedial services pursuant to section 2902 or 2903 of this title. A supervisory union choosing to expend funds in this way shall submit a report describing the services provided and their costs with the final financial report submitted under section 2968 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. July 1, 1991;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1997, No. 60

, §§ 30, 30a, eff. July 1, 1998;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2021;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2961. Section 2961 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2961 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Census grant.

As used in this section:

“Average daily membership” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 4001(1) of this title, except it shall exclude State-placed students.

“Average daily membership of a supervisory union” means the aggregate average daily membership of the school districts that are members of the supervisory union or, for a supervisory district, the average daily membership of the supervisory district.

“Long-term membership” of a supervisory union in any school year means the average of the supervisory union’s average daily membership over the most recent three school years for which data are available.

“Uniform base amount” means an amount determined by:

dividing an amount:

equal to the average State appropriation for fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020 for special education under sections 2961 (standard mainstream block grants), 2963 (special education expenditures reimbursement), and 2963a (exceptional circumstances) of this title; and

increased by:

for each of fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023, the annual change in the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment as reported by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis (inflation factor); and

for each of fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, the average inflation factor for fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023; by

the statewide long-term membership.

The State commits to satisfying its special education maintenance of fiscal support requirement under 34 C.F.R. § 300.163(a).

Each supervisory union shall receive a census grant each fiscal year to support the provision of special education services to students on an individualized education program. Supervisory unions shall use this funding and other available sources of funding to provide special education services to students in accordance with their individualized education programs as mandated under federal law. A supervisory union may use census grant funds to support the delivery of the supervisory union’s comprehensive system of educational services under sections 2901 and 2902 of this title, but shall not use census grant funds in a manner that abrogates its responsibility to provide special education services to students in accordance with their individualized education programs as mandated under federal law.

For fiscal year 2023, the amount of the census grant for a supervisory union shall be:
(d) (1) (A) For fiscal year 2023, the amount of the census grant for a supervisory union shall be:

the average amount it received for fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020 from the State for special education under sections 2961 (standard mainstream block grants), 2963 (special education expenditures reimbursement), and 2963a (exceptional circumstances) of this title; increased by

the annual change in the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment as reported by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis.

The amount determined under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1) shall be divided by the supervisory union’s long-term membership, to determine the base amount of the census grant, which is the amount of the census grant calculated on a per student basis.

For fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years, the amount of the census grant for a supervisory union shall be the uniform base amount multiplied by the supervisory union’s long-term membership.

For fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, the amount of the census grant for a supervisory union shall be determined by multiplying the supervisory union’s long-term membership by a base amount established under this subdivision. The base amounts for each supervisory union for fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026 shall move gradually the supervisory union’s fiscal year 2023 base amount to the fiscal year 2027 uniform base amount by prorating the change between the supervisory union’s fiscal year 2023 base amount and the fiscal year 2027 uniform base amount over this three-fiscal-year period.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. July 1, 1991;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1997, No. 60

, §§ 30, 30a, eff. July 1, 1998;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2021;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2961a.
Repealed. 1995, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 30(a)(3).

§ 2962. Section 2962 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2962 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Extraordinary services reimbursement.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, extraordinary services reimbursement shall be payable, based on where the related cost is incurred, to a town school district, city school district, union school district, unified union school district, incorporated school district, the member school districts of an interstate school district, an unorganized town or gore, or to a supervisory union.

The amount of extraordinary services reimbursement provided to each district or supervisory union shall be equal to 95 percent of its extraordinary special education expenditures.

As used in this subchapter, “extraordinary special education expenditures” means a school district’s or supervisory union’s allowable expenditures that for any one child exceed $60,000.00 for a fiscal year. In this subsection, child means a student with disabilities who is three years of age or older in the current school year. The State Board shall define allowable expenditures that shall include any expenditures required under federal law, and any costs of mediation conducted by a mediator who is approved by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 107

, § 6;

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 18, 26;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 1997;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

1997, No. 60

, § 30b, eff. July 1, 1998;

2003, No. 36

, § 13;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 205, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2019;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2962. Section 2962 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2962 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above Extraordinary special education reimbursement.

As used in this section, “child” means a student with disabilities who is three years of age or older in the current school year.
(a) (1) As used in this section, “child” means a student with disabilities who is three years of age or older in the current school year.

As used in this subchapter, “extraordinary expenditures” means a supervisory union’s allowable special education expenditures that for any one child in a fiscal year exceed $60,000.00, increased annually by the annual change in the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment as reported by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis.

The State Board of Education shall define allowable special education expenditures that shall include any expenditures required under federal law in order to implement fully individual education programs under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. chapter 33, and any costs of mediation conducted by a mediator who is approved by the Secretary.

If a supervisory union has extraordinary expenditures, it shall be eligible for extraordinary special education reimbursement (extraordinary reimbursement) as provided in this section.

A supervisory union that has extraordinary expenditures in a fiscal year for any one child shall be eligible for extraordinary reimbursement equal to:

an amount equal to its special education expenditures in that fiscal year for that child that exceed the extraordinary expenditures threshold amount under subdivision (a)(2) of this section (excess expenditures) multiplied by 95 percent; plus

an amount equal to the lesser of:

the amount of its excess expenditures; or

the extraordinary expenditures threshold amount under subdivision (a)(2) of this section; minus
(B) (i) the extraordinary expenditures threshold amount under subdivision (a)(2) of this section; minus

the base amount of the census grant received by the supervisory union under subsection 2961(d) of this title for that fiscal year; multiplied by

60 percent.

The State Board of Education shall establish by rule the administrative process for supervisory unions to submit claims for extraordinary reimbursement under this section and for the review and payment of those claims.

Under section 2973 of this title, a supervisory union, in its role as the local education agency, may place a student with an individualized education program under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. chapter 33, with certain approved independent schools that accept public tuition. If the approved independent school is entitled to special education cost reimbursement under that section, it may bill the supervisory union for excess special education costs incurred by the independent school in providing special education services to that student beyond those covered by general tuition. If those costs for that student exceed the extraordinary expenditures threshold as defined in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the supervisory union shall be entitled to extraordinary reimbursement under this section for that student as if it incurred those costs directly.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 107

, § 6;

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 18, 26;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 1997;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

1997, No. 60

, § 30b, eff. July 1, 1998;

2003, No. 36

, § 13;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 205, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2019;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2963. Section 2963 repealed effective July 1, 2022. Special education expenditures reimbursement.

Based on where the related cost is incurred, each town school district, city school district, union school district, unified union school district, incorporated school district, the member school districts of an interstate school district, and unorganized town or gore or supervisory union shall receive a special education expenditures reimbursement grant each school year.

The amount of a school district’s or supervisory union’s special education expenditures reimbursement shall be equal to the total of its special education expenditures multiplied by the reimbursement rate for that year.

As used in this subchapter:

Special education expenditures are allowable expenditures for special education, as defined by rule of the State Board, less the following:

revenue from federal aid for special education;

mainstream service costs, as defined in subdivision 2961(c)(1) of this title;

extraordinary special education expenditures, as defined in section 2962 of this title;

any transportation expenses already reimbursed;

special education costs for a student eligible for aid under section 2963a of this title; and

other State funds used for special education costs as defined by the State Board by rule.

The State Board shall define allowable expenditures under this subsection. Allowable expenditures shall include any expenditures required under federal law.

“Special education expenditures reimbursement rate” means a percentage of special education expenditures that is calculated to achieve the 60 percent share required by subsection 2967(b) of this title.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 107

, § 7;

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. July 1, 1991;

1991, No. 104

, § 1, eff. June 27, 1991;

1991, No. 104

, § 3;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. July 1, 1997;

1997, No. 60

, § 30c, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 114, eff. March 11, 1998;

2001, No. 8

, § 13;

2003, No. 36

, § 14;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017; repealed on July 1, 2022 by

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, as amended by

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(b).

§ 2963a. Section 2963a repealed effective July 1, 2022. Exceptional circumstances.

In lieu of reimbursement under section 2963 of this title, the Secretary shall reimburse a school district or supervisory union for 80 percent of the costs not eligible for reimbursement under section 2962 of this title for each student causing the school district or supervisory union to be eligible for extraordinary services reimbursement pursuant to that section. However, in order for a school district or supervisory union to be eligible for reimbursement under this section, the total costs of the school district or supervisory union eligible for extraordinary services reimbursement must equal or exceed 15 percent of the total costs eligible for State assistance under sections 2961, 2962, and 2963 of this title.

An eligible school district or supervisory union may apply to the Secretary to receive reimbursement under this section. The Secretary shall award reimbursement to a school district or supervisory union under this section if the Secretary makes a determination that the school district or supervisory union considered all the cost-effective and appropriate available alternatives for placement and programs for students before incurring these costs. A decision of the Secretary shall be final.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 87, eff. March 11, 1998; amended

1999, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 10, 2000;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 206, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017; repealed on July 1, 2022 by

2019, No. 72

, § E.502.2, as amended by

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(b).

§ 2964. Section 2964 repealed effective July 1, 2022. Service plan.

As a condition of receiving assistance under this subchapter, a supervisory union shall file a service plan with the Secretary annually on or before October 15. The service plan shall contain the anticipated special education expenditures for the following school year for the supervisory union and its member districts. The plan shall be in a form prescribed by the Secretary and shall include information on services planned and anticipated expenditures.

If a supervisory union fails to file a service plan by October 15, the Secretary may withhold any funds due the supervisory union and its member districts under this title until a service plan is filed and accepted by the Secretary as properly completed.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 107

, § 8; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. July 1, 1991;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 207, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017; repealed on July 1, 2022 by

2019, No. 72

, § E.502.2 as amended by

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(b).

§ 2965.
Withholding of aid.

If a supervisory union, school district, or agency fails to meet its legally established obligations toward a child with a disability or the child’s parent, and as a result the Agency of Education incurs costs to meet these obligations beyond those otherwise incurred under this chapter, the Secretary shall withhold the amount of funds incurred from any grants due the supervisory union, school district, or agency under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 208, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 2966.
Repealed. 1995, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 30(a)(4).

§ 2967. Section 2967 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2967 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Aid projection; State share.

On or before December 15, the Secretary shall publish an estimate, by supervisory union and its member districts to the extent they anticipate reimbursable expenditures under this chapter, of the amount of State assistance necessary to fully fund sections 2961 through 2963 of this title in the ensuing school year.

The total expenditures made by the State in any fiscal year pursuant to this chapter shall be 60 percent of the statewide total special education expenditures of funds that are not derived from federal sources. Special education expenditures shall include:

costs eligible for grants and reimbursements under sections 2961 through 2963a of this title;

costs for services for persons who are visually impaired and persons who are deaf and hard of hearing;

costs for the interdisciplinary team program;

costs for regional specialists in multiple disabilities;

funds expended for training and programs to meet the needs of students with emotional behavioral problems under subsection 2969(c) of this title; and

funds expended for training under subsection 2969(d) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 60

, § 30d, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 88, eff. March 11, 1998;

2003, No. 36

, § 15;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2011, No. 58

, § 5, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 209, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 79;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2967. Section 2967 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2967 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Aid projection.

On or before December 15, the Secretary shall publish an estimate, by each supervisory union, of its anticipated State special education funding under this chapter for the ensuing school year.

As used in this section, State special education funding shall include:

funds eligible for grants and reimbursements under sections 2961 and 2962 of this title;

funds for services for persons who are visually impaired;

funds for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing;

funds for the interdisciplinary team program;

funds expended for training and programs to meet the needs of students with emotional or behavioral challenges under subsection 2969(c) of this title; and

funds expended for training under subsection 2969(d) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 60

, § 30d, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 88, eff. March 11, 1998;

2003, No. 36

, § 15;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2011, No. 58

, § 5, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 209, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 79;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022;

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2968. Section 2968 repealed effective July 1, 2022. Reports.

On or before November 15, March 15, and August 1 of each school year, each supervisory union and its member districts to the extent they incur reimbursable expenditures under this chapter shall file a financial report with the Secretary in a form prescribed by the Secretary. The report shall describe total expenditures for special education actually incurred during the preceding period, and shall describe revenues derived from different funding sources, including federal assistance, State assistance under this chapter, and local effort.

If a supervisory union or its member districts that have incurred reimbursable expenditures under this chapter fail to file a complete report by August 1, until the properly completed August 1 report is filed and accepted by the Secretary, the Secretary may withhold any funds due the supervisory union or school district under this title and shall subtract $100.00 per business day from funds due to the supervisory union or school district under this title for that fiscal year. The Secretary may waive the $100.00 penalty required under this subsection upon appeal by the supervisory union or school district. The Secretary shall establish procedures for administration of this subsection.

The Secretary shall review and monitor the reports received pursuant to subsection (a) of this section as well as the service plans received pursuant to section 2964 of this title, and shall assist supervisory unions and school districts to complete and submit these documents in a timely and accurate fashion.

Special education receipts and expenditures shall be included within the audits required of a supervisory union and its member districts that have incurred reimbursable expenditures under this chapter pursuant to section 323 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 210, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017; repealed on July 1, 2022 by

2019, No. 72

, § E.502.2, as amended by

2019, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(b).

§ 2969. Section 2969 effective until July 1, 2022; see also section 2969 effective July 1, 2022 set out below. Payments.

On or before August 15, December 15, and April 15 of each school year, the State Treasurer shall withdraw from the Education Fund, based on warrant of the Commissioner of Finance and Management, and shall forward to each supervisory union and its member districts to the extent they anticipate reimbursable expenditures under this chapter, the amount of State assistance estimated in accordance with State Board rules to be necessary to fund sections 2961 through 2963a of this title in the current fiscal period. The State Board shall by rule ensure that the amount of such assistance shall be adjusted to compensate for any overpayments or underpayments determined, after review and acceptance of the reports submitted under section 2968 of this title, to have been made in previous periods. Notwithstanding this subsection, failure to submit the reports within the timelines established by subsection 2968(a) of this title shall result in the withholding of any payments until the report is filed.

[Repealed.]

For the purpose of meeting the needs of students with emotional behavioral problems, each fiscal year the Secretary shall use for training, program development, and building school and regional capacity, up to one percent of the State funds appropriated under this subchapter.

For the training of teachers, administrators, and other personnel in the identification and evaluation of, and provision of education services to children who require educational supports, each fiscal year the Secretary shall use up to 0.75 percent of the State funds appropriated under this subchapter. In order to set priorities for the use of these funds, the Secretary shall identify effective practices and areas of critical need. The Secretary may expend up to five percent of these funds for statewide training and shall distribute the remaining funds to school districts or supervisory unions.

School districts and supervisory unions that apply for funds under this section must submit a plan for training that will result in lasting changes in their school systems and give assurances that at least 50 percent of the costs of training, including in-kind costs, will be assumed by the applicant. The Secretary shall establish written procedures and criteria for the award of such funds. In addition, the Secretary may identify schools most in need of training assistance and may pay for 100 percent of the assistance to the supervisory union or school district for these schools to fund the provision of training assistance for these schools.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 107

, § 9; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 22;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 19 eff. July 1, 1997;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1997, No. 60

, § 30e, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 116, eff. March 11, 1998;

2005, No. 71

, § 267;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 211, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 2969. Section 2969 effective July 1, 2022; see also section 2969 effective until July 1, 2022 set out above. Payments.

On or before August 15, December 15, and April 15 of each fiscal year, the State Treasurer shall withdraw from the Education Fund, based on a warrant issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management, and shall forward to each supervisory union one-third of the census grant due to the supervisory union under section 2961 of this title for that fiscal year.
(a) (1) On or before August 15, December 15, and April 15 of each fiscal year, the State Treasurer shall withdraw from the Education Fund, based on a warrant issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management, and shall forward to each supervisory union one-third of the census grant due to the supervisory union under section 2961 of this title for that fiscal year.

On or before November 15, January 15, April 15, and August 1 of each school year, each supervisory union, to the extent it incurs extraordinary expenditures under section 2962 of this title, shall file a financial report with the Secretary in a form prescribed by the Secretary. The report shall describe total extraordinary expenditures actually incurred during the reporting period.

On or before December 15, February 15, May 15, and September 15 of each school year, based on a warrant issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management, the State Treasurer shall withdraw from the Education Fund and shall forward to each supervisory union the amount of extraordinary reimbursement incurred by the supervisory union under section 2962 of this title that is unreimbursed and determined by the Agency of Education to be payable to the supervisory union.

[Repealed.]

For the purpose of meeting the needs of students with emotional or behavioral challenges, each fiscal year the Secretary shall use for training, program development, and building school and regional capacity up to one percent of the State funds appropriated under this subchapter.

For the training of teachers, administrators, and other personnel in the identification and evaluation of and provision of educational services to children who require educational supports, each fiscal year the Secretary shall use up to 0.75 percent of the State funds appropriated under this subchapter. In order to set priorities for the use of these funds, the Secretary shall identify effective practices and areas of critical need. The Secretary may expend up to five percent of these funds for statewide training and shall distribute the remaining funds to school districts or supervisory unions.

School districts and supervisory unions that apply for funds under this section must submit a plan for training that will result in lasting changes in their school systems and give assurances that at least 50 percent of the costs of training, including in-kind costs, will be assumed by the applicant. The Secretary shall establish written procedures and criteria for the award of such funds. In addition, the Secretary may identify schools most in need of training assistance and may pay for 100 percent of the assistance to the supervisory union or school district for these schools to fund the provision of training assistance for these schools.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 107

, § 9; amended

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 22;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 19 eff. July 1, 1997;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1997, No. 60

, § 30e, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 116, eff. March 11, 1998;

2005, No. 71

, § 267;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 211, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2022.

§§ 2970,
2971.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 2972.
Repealed. 1995, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 30(a)(4).

§ 2973. Section 2973 effective until July 1, 2023; see also section 2973 effective July 1, 2023 set out below. Independent school tuition rates.

The Secretary shall establish minimum standards of services for students receiving special education in independent schools in Vermont; shall set, after consultation with independent schools in Vermont, the maximum rates to be paid by the Agency and school districts for tuition, room, and board based on the level of services; and may advise independent schools as to the need for certain special education services in Vermont.

Neither school districts nor any State agency shall pay rates for tuition, room, and board, for students receiving special education in independent schools outside Vermont that are in excess of allowable costs approved by the authorized body in the state in which the independent school is located, except in exceptional circumstances or for a child who needs exceptional services, as approved by the Secretary.

The State Board is authorized to enter into interstate compacts with other states to regulate rates for tuition, room, and board for students receiving special education in independent schools.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 212, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. July 1, 2023.